Louisiana, session 2026, HB949.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3207(A)(2) and (4) and (B)(introductory paragraph), (1), and (2),
3208(A)(introductory paragraph) and (B), 3211 through 3213, 3216, 3218, and
3219(A)(introductory paragraph), (1), (2), (4), (5), and (8) and (B) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 37:3200(13) and (14), 3207(C) and (D), 3208(C), 3210(E), and
3219(A)(11) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
§3200. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(13) "Limited purpose permit" means a permit issued for a limited purpose
in scope as defined by rules adopted by the board authorizing an individual to
perform certain radiologic procedures. "Limited purpose permit" does not mean or
include a temporary working permit issued by the board.
(14) "Radiologist assistant" means a radiologic technologist licensed
pursuant to this Chapter who holds current certification as a radiologist assistant
from the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists. A radiologist assistant
may perform advanced imaging procedures and patient management tasks delegated
and performed under the direct supervision of a radiologist. A radiologist assistant
shall not interpret images, render diagnoses, or prescribe medications or therapies.
* * *
§3207. Duties and powers of the board
A. The board shall:
* * *
(2) Examine, license, renew licenses of, permit, renew permits of and issue
temporary working permits to duly qualified applicants for licensure or permit as
radiologic technologists, nuclear technologists, radiation therapy technologists,
fusion technologists, limited purpose permit holders, and radiologist assistants.
* * *
(4) Conduct hearings upon charges calling for discipline of a licensee or
permittee.
* * *
B. The board may do all of the following:
(1) Establish pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act a code of ethics
for radiologic technologists persons licensed or permitted pursuant to this Chapter.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
(2) Establish pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act continuing
education requirements for license or limited purpose permit renewal.
* * *
C. The board shall not expand the scope of practice of radiologist assistants
or limited purpose permit holders beyond the duties authorized in this Chapter.
D. The board shall not promulgate or adopt rules regulating private
radiological technologists including but not limited to educational and credentialing
requirements and practice and supervision standards.
§3208. Qualifications of applicants
A. An applicant for licensure or limited purpose permit under in accordance
with the provisions of this Chapter must shall verify by oath or affirmation that he
is all of the following:
* * *
B. Each applicant for a license or temporary working permit as a radiologic
technologist shall have successfully completed a course of study in radiography,
radiation therapy technology, fusion technology, or nuclear medicine technology,
approved by the board in accordance with standards promulgated by the board.
C.(1) Each applicant for a license as a radiologist assistant shall hold a
current certification as a registered radiologist assistant from the American Registry
of Radiologic Technologists.
(2) Each applicant for a temporary working permit to practice as a
radiologist assistant shall have successfully completed an educational program for
radiologist assistants approved by the board.
* * *
§3210. Examination; persons exempt
* * *
E. Upon application and payment for a limited purpose permit, the board
may issue an initial temporary working permit to any person meeting the education,
training, examination, and competency criteria for the applicable limited purpose
permit as outlined in rules promulgated by the board.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
§3211. Licensure
The board shall issue a license to and authorize the use of the title "Licensed
Radiologic Technologist" or "Licensed Radiologist Assistant" by each applicant who
has successfully passed the certification examination or has otherwise been qualified
under pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter and has paid all fees required by this
Chapter.
§3212. Licensing by reciprocity
The board shall issue a license without examination to persons who are
licensed as radiologic technologists or radiologist assistants under the laws of other
states provided that the standards under which they were licensed are at least as
stringent as those established by the board.
§3213. Necessity of license or permit; prohibited acts
A. No person shall assume or use the title or designation of "Licensed
Radiologic Technologist" or "Licensed Radiologist Assistant" unless he holds a
current license issued to him in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
B. No person, other than a licensed practitioner, dental hygienist, dental
assistant, chiropractor's assistant, person who performs diagnostic or therapeutic
radiological examination or treatment, or both, in a private office of a physician or
in a clinic performing such activities under the direct supervision of a physician, or
a radiologic technologist licensed under pursuant to this Chapter, shall use ionizing
radiation or equipment emitting or detecting ionizing radiation on humans for
diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
C. No person shall knowingly employ as a radiologic technologist,
radiologist assistant, or limited purpose permit holder, any person required by the
provisions of this Chapter to hold a license or temporary working or limited purpose
permit who does not hold a license or temporary working or limited purpose permit
under pursuant to this Chapter.
D. No person holding a license or temporary working or limited purpose
permit under pursuant to this Chapter shall use radioactive substances or equipment
emitting or detecting ionizing radiation on humans for diagnostic or therapeutic
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
purposes unless under the direction and supervision of a licensed practitioner and
unless so directed by prescription of a licensed practitioner. This Subsection shall
not apply to a radiologist assistant, who shall practice only as provided in Subsection
E of this Section.
E. A radiologist assistant shall perform advanced imaging procedures
specifically authorized by the board only when delegated by and conducted under the
direct supervision of a radiologist. A radiologist assistant shall not interpret,
diagnose, or prescribe medications or therapies.
* * *
§3216. Reinstatement of license or limited purpose permit
A radiologic technologist An individual whose license or permit has lapsed
and who has ceased activities as a radiologic technologist licensee or permittee for
not more than five years may have his license or limited purpose permit reinstated
upon payment of the renewal fee as provided for in R.S. 37:3218 and upon
submission of evidence satisfactory to the board that he has fulfilled continuing
education requirements as promulgated by the board.
* * *
§3218. Fees
A. The board shall promulgate, in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, a reasonable fee schedule for the issuance, renewal, or reinstatement
of any license or permit, for administration of examinations for licensure, or for any
other administrative function provided for in this Chapter. The fee schedule may be
modified from time to time as deemed necessary by the board. The board may
charge and collect the following fees:
(1) An initial license fee for two years not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars.
(2) A duplicate license fee not to exceed fifty dollars per issuance.
(3) A biennial license renewal fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars per
renewal.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
(4) A temporary working or limited purpose permit fee not to exceed
seventy-five dollars per permit issuance.
(5) A permit renewal not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars per renewal.
(6) A delinquency fee in addition to the regular renewal fee not to exceed
two hundred dollars.
(7) A fee for the reinstatement of an expired license of twenty-five dollars
per month of expiration not to exceed three hundred dollars.
(8) A reinstatement after suspension or revocation fee in addition to the
standard renewal fee not to exceed five hundred dollars per case.
(9) A dishonored payment processing fee not to exceed one hundred dollars
per occurrence.
(10) An electronic or credit card transaction fee not to exceed the actual cost
incurred.
(11) A fee for photocopies of documents not to exceed fifty cents per page.
(12) A creation or provision of electronic data or service fee not to exceed
the actual cost incurred.
(13) An official licensee mailing list fee not to exceed three hundred dollars
per request.
(14) An official verification of licensure or permit fee not to exceed fifty
dollars per request.
(15) A postage, mailing, shipping, handling, and other related fees not to
exceed the actual costs incurred.
(16) A subpoena or duces tecum issuance fee not to exceed thirty dollars per
issuance.
(17) Administrative hearing, judicial review, or investigative costs not to
exceed the actual costs incurred.
B. All fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be paid
to the secretary-treasurer of the board and shall be used to carry out the purposes of
this Chapter. The board shall set the appropriate fees by rule not to exceed the
amount outlined in Subsection A of this Section.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
§3219. Discipline; causes for censure, reprimand, suspension or revocation of
license or temporary working or limited purpose permit
A. The board may suspend or revoke any license or temporary working or
limited purpose permit to practice as a radiologic technologist or censure, reprimand,
or otherwise discipline a licensee or permittee upon proof that the person:
(1) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in the procurement or holding of the license
or temporary working or limited purpose permit.
(2) Has been convicted of a felony in a court of competent jurisdiction, either
within or outside of this state, unless the conviction has been reversed and the holder
of the license or temporary working or limited purpose permit holder discharged and
acquitted; or if the holder has been pardoned with full restoration of civil rights, in
which case the license or temporary working or limited purpose permit shall be
restored.
* * *
(4) Has aided and abetted a person who is not a licensed radiologic
technologist or otherwise authorized by this Chapter to perform the duties of a
license holder. Has knowingly trained, aided, abetted, or permitted a person who is
not licensed, permitted, or otherwise authorized, in accordance with this Chapter, to
perform duties requiring a license or permit in accordance with this Chapter.
(5) Has undertaken or engaged in any practice beyond the scope of duties
permitted a license holder under pursuant to this Chapter.
* * *
(8) Is or has been found guilty of incompetence or negligence in his
performance as a license or temporary working or limited purpose permit holder.
* * *
(11) Has interpreted images, rendered diagnoses, or prescribed medications
or therapies.
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 949 ENROLLED
B. Proceedings against the holder of a license or temporary working or
limited purpose permit under pursuant to this Chapter shall be instituted in
compliance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act as contained in
R.S. 49:950, et seq.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:3210(B) and 3221 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.